Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.170

Application of chapter to homes or institutions operated by certain religious organizations.

Nothing in this chapter or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto shall be construed as authorizing the supervision, regulation, or control of the remedial care or treatment of residents or patients in any nursing home or institution conducted for those who rely upon treatment by prayer or spiritual means in accordance with the creed or tenets of any well-recognized church or religious denomination, or for any nursing home or institution operated for the exclusive care of members of a convent as defined in RCW 84.36.800 or rectory, monastery, or other institution operated for the care of members of the clergy.

[ 1977 c 48 s 1; 1951 c 117 s 21.]